Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,127
Display of unauthorized signs, signals, or markings; public nuisance; removal.

(1) No person shall place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway any unauthorized sign, signal, light, marking, or device which purports to be, is an imitation of, or resembles a lawful traffic control device or railroad sign or signal, which uses the words stop or danger prominently displayed, which implies the need or requirement of stopping or the existence of danger, which attempts to direct the movement of traffic, which otherwise copies or resembles any lawful traffic control device, or which hides from view or interferes with the effectiveness of a traffic control device or any railroad sign or signal.

(2) No person shall place or maintain nor shall any public authority permit upon any highway any traffic sign or signal which bears commercial advertising except as authorized by sections 39-204 to 39-206.

(3) This section shall not be deemed to prohibit the erection upon private property adjacent to highways of signs giving useful directional information and of a type that cannot be mistaken for official signs unless prohibited by another statute.

(4) Every such prohibited sign, signal, or marking is hereby declared to be a public nuisance, and the authority having jurisdiction over any highway where such prohibited sign, signal, or marking is found may remove it or cause it to be removed without notice.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-618;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 223.